District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.54

Amendment of articles of incorporation — Procedure after acceptance of subscriptions to shares.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 201, ch. 269, § 54
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(q), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.54.
1981 Ed., § 29-354.
1973 Ed., § 29-921h.